Alabama, session 2026rs, HB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 36-26-35 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§36-26-35
(a) All persons who are regularly employed by the state
and who are subject to the provisions of the state Merit
Page 1

and who are subject to the provisions of the state Merit
HB6 INTRODUCED
System, and all legislative personnel, officers, and
employees, including, but not limited to, Legislative Services
Agency personnel, whether subject to the state Merit System or
not, shall be entitled to accumulate annual leave on the basis
of biweekly pay periods through the payday on March 17, 2006,
as follows:
Employee's total service Accumulation of Annual
with: leave per pay period Accumulation
Fewer than five years'
4 hours 13 days
service
Five but less than 10 16 days 2
5 hours
years' service hours
10 but less than 15 19 days 4
6 hours
years' service hours
15 but less than 20 22 days 6
7 hours
years' service hours
20 but less than 25
8 hours 26 days
years' service
25 years of service or 29 days 2
9 hours
more hours
(b) Beginning with the payday on April 3, 2006, all
persons who are regularly employed by the state and who are
subject to the provisions of the state Merit System, and all
legislative personnel, officers, and employees, including, but
not limited to, Legislative Services Agency personnel, whether
subject to the state Merit System or not, shall be entitled to
Page 2

subject to the state Merit System or not, shall be entitled to
HB6 INTRODUCED
accumulate annual leave on the basis of semi-monthly pay
periods as follows:
Employee's total service Accumulation of Annual
with: leave per pay period Accumulation
Fewer than five years'
4 hours 20 minutes 13 days
service
Five but less than 10 16 days 2
5 hours 25 minutes
years' service hours
10 but less than 15 19 days 4
6 hours 30 minutes
years' service hours
15 but less than 20 22 days 6
7 hours 35 minutes
years' service hours
20 but less than 25
8 hours 40 minutes 26 days
years' service
25 years of service or 29 days 2
9 hours 45 minutes
more hours
(c) Maximum accrued leave after 25 years of service
shall be limited to 29 1/4 days per year, and the maximum
number of days of annual leave which may be carried over at
the end of each year shall be limited to 60 days.
(d) Any law enforcement officer in the Department of
Public Safety Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency shall be
entitled to receive payment for any accrued and unused annual
leave days in excess of 60 days, up to a maximum of 10 days
per year. Payment shall be calculated using the officer's
regular rate of pay.
Page 3

regular rate of pay.
HB6 INTRODUCED
(e) Any merit classification of employee of the
Department of Corrections requiring certification as
correctional or law enforcement officers by the Alabama Peace
Officers' Standards and Training Commission may receive
payment for any accrued and unused annual leave hours in
excess of 480 hours, up to a maximum of 80 hours per year.
Payment shall be calculated using the employee's regular rate
100 of pay."
101 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
102 1, 2026.
Page 4